dictsource/so_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Somali


.group '
   '       ?

.group b
   b       b
   bb      b:

.group t
   t       t

.group j
   j       J

.group x
   x       H

.group d
   d       d
   dd      d:
   dh      d.

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       s
   sh      S

.group c
   c       A

.group g
   g       g

.group f
   f       f

.group q
   q       G

.group k
   k       k
   kh      X

.group l
   l       l

.group m
   m       m

.group n
   n       n

.group w
   w       w
   
.group h
   h       h

.group y
   y       j

.group a
   a       a
   aa      a:

.group e
   e       e
   ee      E:

.group i
   i       i
   ii      i:

.group o
   o       o
   oo      o:

.group u
   u       u
   uu      u:

.group                   // this some vowel letters can be considered a tones
   á       a2
   é       e2
   í       i2
   ó       o2
   ú       u2
   à       a1
   è       e1
   ì       i1
   ò       o1
   ù       u1
   â       a3
   ê       e3
   î       i3
   ô       o3
   û       u3
